fr: Type de jouet de construction: Construction architecturale; Blocs de construction; Blocs à emboîter; Dalles magnétiques; Modèles réduits; Kits de construction robotique; Ensembles de construction STEM; Autre
nb: Byggeleketype: Arkitektonisk konstruksjon; Byggeklosser; Sammenlåsende mursteiner; Magnetiske fliser; Modellsett; Robotikk byggesett; STEM-byggingssett; Annet
ru: Тип конструктора: Архитектурное строительство; Строительные блоки; Сцепляющиеся кирпичи; Магнитные плитки; Наборы моделей; Наборы для сборки робототехники; Наборы для строительства STEM; Другое
nl: Type bouwspeelgoed: Architectonische constructie; Bouwblokken; In elkaar grijpende bakstenen; Magnetische tegels; Bouwpaketten; Bouwpakketten voor robotica; STEM-bouwsets; Andere
el: Τύπος παιχνιδιού κατασκευής: Αρχιτεκτονική κατασκευή; Οικοδομικά τετράγωνα; Συναρμοζόμενα τούβλα; Μαγνητικά πλακάκια; Σετ μοντελισμού; Σετ κατασκευής ρομπότ; Σετ κατασκευής STEM; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta igračke za slaganje: Arhitektonska gradnja; Kocke za slaganje; Isprepletene cigle; Magnetne pločice; Kompleti za izradu maketa; Kompleti za gradnju robotike; STEM setovi za izradu; Ostalo
cs: Typ stavební hračky: Architektonické stavitelství; Stavební kostky; Skládací bloky; Magnetické dlaždice; Stavebnice modelů; Robotické stavebnice; Stavebnice STEM; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de brinquedo de construção: Construção arquitetônica; Blocos de construção; Blocos de encaixar; Ladrilhos magnéticos; Conjuntos de modelos; Kits de construção de robótica; Conjuntos de construção de ciências; Outro
ro-RO: Tip de jucărie de construit: Construcție arhitectonică; Cuburi de construit; Cuburi conectabile; Plăci magnetice; Seturi pentru machete la scară; Seturi de robotică; Seturi de construcție STEM; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta igrače za sestavljanje: Arhitekturna gradnja; Gradniki; Opeke za suho gradnjo; Magnetne ploščice; Kompleti modelov; Robotski gradbeni kompleti; Gradbeni kompleti STEM; Drugo
zh-CN: 建筑玩具类型: 建筑构造; 建筑积木; 镶嵌/拼插积木; 磁力片; 模型套件; 机器人组装套件; STEM 积木套装; 其他
zh-TW: 積木玩具類型: 建築施工; 拼砌積木; 組合積木; 磁磚; 模型套件; 機器人拼裝套件; STEM 拼裝玩具組; 其他
sv: Typ av byggleksak: Arkitektonisk konstruktion; Byggklossar; Sammankopplade klossar; Magnetiska plattor; Kit för modellbyggen; Byggsatser för robotar; STEM-byggsatser; Övrigt
ko: 블록 장난감 타입: 건축 공사; 블록 쌓기 장난감; 완구용 조립 벽돌; 자석 타일; 모형 세트; 로봇 제작 키트; STEM 조립 세트; 기타
es: Tipo de juguete de construcción: Construcción arquitectónica; Bloques de construcción; Bloques ensamblados; Azulejos magnéticos; Kits para modelismo; kits de construcción de robótica; Juegos de construcción STEM; Otros
pt-PT: Tipo de brinquedo de construção: Construção arquitetónica; Blocos de construção; Tijolos de encaixar; Ladrilhos magnéticos; Kits de modelo à escala; Kits de construção de robótica; Jogos de construção STEM; Outro
fi: Rakennuslelutyyppi: Rakennuslelut; Rakennuspalikat; Rakennuspalikat; Magneettilaatat; Pienoismallit; Robotiikka-rakennussarjat; STEM-rakennussarjat; Muu
pl: Materiał zabawki do budowania: Konstrukcje architektoniczne; Klocki; Klocki z zaczepami; Płytki magnetyczne; Zestawy do modelarstwa; Zestawy do budowania robotów; Zestawy konstrukcyjne STEM; Inne
sk-SK: Typ stavebnice: Architektonická konštrukcia; Stavebné bloky; Zámkové tehly; Magnetické dlaždice; Modelové súpravy; Robotické stavebnice; Stavebnice STEM; Iné
vi: Loại đồ chơi xây dựng: Xây dựng kiến trúc; Đồ chơi lắp ráp; Bộ đồ chơi lắp ráp; Gạch từ tính; Bộ dụng cụ mô hình; Bộ dụng cụ xây dựng robot; Bộ lắp ráp STEM; Khác
da: Type af byggelegetøj: Arkitektonisk byggeri; Byggeklodser; Sammenlåsende byggeklodser; Magnetiske fliser; Modelsæt; Robotbyggesæt; STEM-byggesæt; Andet
bg-BG: Тип строителна играчка: Архитектурно строителство; Строителни блокове; Съединяващи се тухли; Магнитни плочки; Комплекти на модели; Комплекти за конструиране на роботи; Комплекти за конструиране STEM; Други
ja: 建物のおもちゃのタイプ: 建築工事; 積み木; 組み立てブロック; 磁気タイル; モデルキット; ロボット組み立てキット; STEM組み立てセット; その他
en: Building toy type: Architectural construction; Building blocks; Interlocking bricks; Magnetic tiles; Model kits; Robotics building kits; STEM building sets; Other
de: Bauspielzeugtyp: Architektonische Konstruktion; Bausteine; Ineinander greifende Ziegel; Magnetische Fliesen; Modellbausätze; Robotik-Baukästen; STEM-Baukästen; Sonstiges
th: ประเภทของเล่นตัวต่อ: โครงสร้างทางสถาปัตยกรรม; บล็อกตัวต่อ; อิฐบล็อกประสาน; กระเบื้องแม่เหล็ก; ขุดต่อโมเดล; ชุดสร้างหุ่นยนต์; ชุดสร้างทักษะ STEM; อื่นๆ
hu: Építőjáték típusa: Házépítő játék; Építőkockák; Egymásba illeszthető építőelemek; Mágneslapok; Modellező készletek; Robotépítő készletek; STEM építőkészletek; Egyéb
tr: Yapı oyuncağı tipi: Mimari inşaat; Yapı blokları; Birbirine geçen bloklar; Manyetik fayans; Maket setleri; Robotik yapı kitleri; Çubuklu yapı setleri; Diğer
it: Tipo di giocattolo da costruzione: Costruzione architettonica; Blocchi per costruzioni; Blocchi a incastro; Piastrelle magnetiche; Kit di modelli; Kit di costruzione di robotica; Set di costruzione STEM; Altro
lt-LT: Konstruktoriaus tipas: Architektūrinis statinys; Statybiniai blokeliai; Sujungiami blokeliai; Magnetinės plytelės; Modelių rinkiniai; Robotikos konstruktorių rinkiniai; STEM konstruktorių rinkiniai; Kita